Illinois, session 104th, HB3681.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by 5changing Section 4.36 and by adding Section 4.41 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 80/4.36)7    Sec. 4.36. Acts repealed on January 1, 2026. The following 8Acts are repealed on January 1, 2026: 9    The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, and 10Nail Technology Act of 1985.11    The Collection Agency Act.12    The Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act.13    The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act.14    The Illinois Dental Practice Act. 15    The Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act.16    The Illinois Physical Therapy Act.17    The Professional Geologist Licensing Act.18    The Respiratory Care Practice Act.19(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15; 99-204, eff. 7-30-15; 2099-227, eff. 8-3-15; 99-229, eff. 8-3-15; 99-230, eff. 8-3-15; 2199-427, eff. 8-21-15; 99-469, eff. 8-26-15; 99-492, eff. 2212-31-15; 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.)   HB3681 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1    (5 ILCS 80/4.41 new)2    Sec. 4.41. Act repealed on January 1, 2031. The following 3Act is repealed on January 1, 2031:4    The Respiratory Care Practice Act. 5    Section 15. The Respiratory Care Practice Act is amended 6by changing Sections 10, 15, 20, 22, 30, 35, 42, 50, 60, 65, 770, 80, 85, 90, 95, 100, 105, 110, 135, 155, 160, 170, and 180 8and by adding Section 12 as follows: 9    (225 ILCS 106/10)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)11    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act:12    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 13by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 14file or license file as maintained by the Department's 15licensure maintenance unit. It is the duty of the applicant or 16licensee to inform the Department of any change of address and 17those changes must be made either through the Department's 18website or by contacting the Department. 19    "Advanced practice registered nurse" means an advanced 20practice registered nurse licensed under the Nurse Practice 21Act. 22    "Board" means the Respiratory Care Board appointed by the 23Secretary.24    "Basic respiratory care activities" means and includes all   HB3681 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1of the following activities: 2        (1) Cleaning, disinfecting, and sterilizing equipment 3    used in the practice of respiratory care as delegated by a 4    licensed health care professional or other authorized 5    licensed personnel.6        (2) Assembling equipment used in the practice of 7    respiratory care as delegated by a licensed health care 8    professional or other authorized licensed personnel.9        (3) Collecting and reviewing patient data through 10    non-invasive means, provided that the collection and 11    review does not include the individual's interpretation of 12    the clinical significance of the data. Collecting and 13    reviewing patient data includes the performance of pulse 14    oximetry and non-invasive monitoring procedures in order 15    to obtain vital signs and notification to licensed health 16    care professionals and other authorized licensed personnel 17    in a timely manner.18        (4) Maintaining a nasal cannula or face mask for 19    oxygen therapy in the proper position on the patient's 20    face.21        (5) Assembling a nasal cannula or face mask for oxygen 22    therapy at patient bedside in preparation for use.23        (6) Maintaining a patient's natural airway by 24    physically manipulating the jaw and neck, suctioning the 25    oral cavity, or suctioning the mouth or nose with a bulb 26    syringe.  HB3681 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1        (7) Performing assisted ventilation during emergency 2    resuscitation using a manual resuscitator.3        (8) Using a manual resuscitator at the direction of a 4    licensed health care professional or other authorized 5    licensed personnel who is present and performing routine 6    airway suctioning. These activities do not include care of 7    a patient's artificial airway or the adjustment of 8    mechanical ventilator settings while a patient is 9    connected to the ventilator. 10    "Basic respiratory care activities" does not mean 11activities that involve any of the following: 12        (1) Specialized knowledge that results from a course 13    of education or training in respiratory care.14        (2) An unreasonable risk of a negative outcome for the 15    patient.16        (3) The assessment or making of a decision concerning 17    patient care.18        (4) The administration of aerosol medication or 19    medical gas.20        (5) The insertion and maintenance of an artificial 21    airway.22        (6) Mechanical ventilatory support.23        (7) Patient assessment.24        (8) Patient education. 25        (9) The transferring of oxygen devices, for purposes 26    of patient transport, with a liter flow greater than 6   HB3681 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1    liters per minute, and the transferring of oxygen devices 2    at any liter flow being delivered to patients less than 12 3    years of age. 4    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 5Professional Regulation.6    "Email address of record" means the designated email 7address recorded by the Department in the applicant's or 8licensee's application file or license file as maintained by 9the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 10    "Licensed" means that which is required to hold oneself 11out as a respiratory care practitioner as defined in this Act.12    "Licensed health care professional" means a physician 13licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, a licensed 14advanced practice registered nurse, or a licensed physician 15assistant.16    "Order" means a written, oral, or telecommunicated 17authorization for respiratory care services for a patient by 18(i) a licensed health care professional who maintains medical 19supervision of the patient and makes a diagnosis or verifies 20that the patient's condition is such that it may be treated by 21a respiratory care practitioner or (ii) a certified registered 22nurse anesthetist in a licensed hospital or ambulatory 23surgical treatment center. 24    "Other authorized licensed personnel" means a licensed 25respiratory care practitioner, a licensed registered nurse, or 26a licensed practical nurse whose scope of practice authorizes   HB3681 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1the professional to supervise an individual who is not 2licensed, certified, or registered as a health professional.3    "Proximate supervision" means a situation in which an 4individual is responsible for directing the actions of another 5individual in the facility and is physically close enough to 6be readily available, if needed, by the supervised individual. 7    "Respiratory care" and "cardiorespiratory care" mean 8preventative services, evaluation and assessment services, 9therapeutic services, cardiopulmonary disease management, and 10rehabilitative services under the order of a licensed health 11care professional for an individual with a disorder, disease, 12or abnormality of the cardiopulmonary system. These terms 13include, but are not limited to, measuring, observing, 14assessing, and monitoring signs and symptoms, reactions, 15general behavior, and general physical response of individuals 16to respiratory care services, including the determination of 17whether those signs, symptoms, reactions, behaviors, or 18general physical responses exhibit abnormal characteristics; 19the administration of pharmacological and therapeutic agents 20and procedures related to respiratory care services; the 21administration of vaccinations for the prevention of 22respiratory illness upon completion of training set forth by 23rule, limited to patients 18 years of age and older pursuant to 24a valid prescription or standing order by a physician licensed 25to practice medicine in all its branches who, in the course of 26professional practice, administers vaccines to patients; the   HB3681 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1collection of blood specimens and other bodily fluids and 2tissues for, and the performance of, cardiopulmonary 3diagnostic testing procedures, including, but not limited to, 4blood gas analysis; development, implementation, and 5modification of respiratory care treatment plans and provision 6of education and skill training to patients and caregivers 7based on assessed abnormalities of the cardiopulmonary system, 8respiratory care guidelines, referrals, and orders of a 9licensed health care professional; application, operation, and 10management of mechanical ventilatory support and other means 11of life support, including, but not limited to, hemodynamic 12cardiovascular support; and the initiation of emergency 13procedures under the rules promulgated by the Department. The 14Department shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this 15Section, including training and education requirements 16regarding vaccinations, which includes, but is not limited to, 17how to address contraindications and adverse reactions, 18appropriate vaccine storage, proper administration, the 19provision of written notice to the patient's physician, and 20record retention requirements. A respiratory care practitioner 21shall refer to a licensed health care professional physician 22licensed to practice medicine in all its branches any patient 23whose condition, at the time of evaluation or treatment, is 24determined to be beyond the scope of practice of the 25respiratory care practitioner.26    "Respiratory care education program" means a course of   HB3681 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1academic study leading to eligibility for registry or 2certification in respiratory care. The training is to be 3approved by an accrediting agency recognized by the Board and 4shall include an evaluation of competence through a 5standardized testing mechanism that is determined by the Board 6to be both valid and reliable.7    "Respiratory care practitioner" means a person who is 8licensed by the Department of Professional Regulation and 9meets all of the following criteria:10        (1) The person is engaged in the practice of 11    cardiorespiratory care and has the knowledge and skill 12    necessary to administer respiratory care.13        (2) The person is capable of serving as a resource to 14    the licensed health care professional in relation to the 15    technical aspects of cardiorespiratory care and the safe 16    and effective methods for administering cardiorespiratory 17    care modalities.18        (3) The person is able to function in situations of 19    unsupervised patient contact requiring great individual 20    judgment.21    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 22Professional Regulation. 23(Source: P.A. 99-173, eff. 7-29-15; 99-230, eff. 8-3-15; 2499-642, eff. 7-28-16; 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 25    (225 ILCS 106/12 new)  HB3681 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1    Sec. 12. Address of record; email address of record. All 2applicants and licensees shall:3        (1) provide a valid address and email address to the 4    Department, which shall serve as the address of record and 5    email address of record, respectively, at the time of 6    application for licensure or renewal of a license; and7        (2) inform the Department of any change of address of 8    record or email address of record within 14 days after the 9    change either through the Department's website or by 10    contacting the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 11    (225 ILCS 106/15)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 15. Exemptions. 14    (a) This Act does not prohibit a person legally regulated 15in this State by any other Act from engaging in any practice 16for which that person he or she is authorized.17    (b) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit the practice of 18respiratory care by a person who is employed by the United 19States government or any bureau, division, or agency thereof 20while in the discharge of the employee's official duties.21    (c) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the 22activities and services of a person enrolled in an approved 23course of study leading to a degree or certificate of registry 24or certification eligibility in respiratory care if these 25activities and services constitute a part of a supervised   HB3681 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1course of study and if the person is designated by a title 2which clearly indicates the person's his or her status as a 3student or trainee. Status as a student or trainee shall not 4exceed 3 years from the date of enrollment in an approved 5course for an approved associate's degree program or 5 years 6for an approved bachelor's degree program.7    (d) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a person from 8treating ailments by spiritual means through prayer alone in 9accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized 10church or religious denomination.11    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prevent a 12person who is a registered nurse, an advanced practice 13registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, a physician 14assistant, or a physician licensed to practice medicine in all 15its branches from providing respiratory care.16    (f) Nothing in this Act shall limit a person who is 17credentialed by the National Society for Cardiopulmonary 18Technology or the National Board for Respiratory Care from 19performing pulmonary function tests and respiratory care 20procedures related to the pulmonary function test. Individuals 21who do not possess a license to practice respiratory care or a 22license in another health care field may perform basic 23screening spirometry limited to peak flow, forced vital 24capacity, slow vital capacity, and maximum voluntary 25ventilation if they possess spirometry certification from the 26National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health, an   HB3681 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1Office Spirometry Certificate from the American Association 2for Respiratory Care, or other similarly accepted 3certification training. 4    (g) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit the collection and 5analysis of blood by clinical laboratory personnel meeting the 6personnel standards of the Illinois Clinical Laboratory Act.7    (h) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a polysomnographic 8technologist, technician, or trainee, as defined in the job 9descriptions jointly accepted by the American Academy of Sleep 10Medicine, the Association of Polysomnographic Technologists, 11the Board of Registered Polysomnographic Technologists, and 12the American Society of Electroneurodiagnostic Technologists, 13from performing activities within the scope of practice of 14polysomnographic technology while under the direction of a 15physician licensed in this State.16    (i) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a family member 17from providing respiratory care services to an ill person.18    (j) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit an 19unlicensed practitioner in a licensed hospital who is working 20under the proximate supervision of a licensed health care 21professional or other authorized licensed personnel and 22providing direct patient care services from performing basic 23respiratory care activities if the unlicensed practitioner (i) 24has been trained to perform the basic respiratory care 25activities at the facility that employs or contracts with the 26individual and (ii) at a minimum, has annually received an   HB3681 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1evaluation of the unlicensed practitioner's performance of 2basic respiratory care activities documented by the facility.3    (k) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit a 4person enrolled in a respiratory care education program or an 5approved course of study leading to a degree or certification 6in a health care-related discipline that provides respiratory 7care activities within the person's his or her scope of 8practice and employed in a licensed hospital in order to 9provide direct patient care services under the proximate 10supervision direction of other authorized licensed personnel 11from providing respiratory care activities.12    (l) Nothing in this Act prohibits a person licensed as a 13respiratory care practitioner in another jurisdiction from 14providing respiratory care: (i) in a declared emergency in 15this State; (ii) as a member of an organ procurement team; or 16(iii) as part of a medical transport team that is transporting 17a patient into or out of this State. 18(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15; 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 19    (225 ILCS 106/20)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 20. Restrictions and limitations. 22    (a) No person shall, without a valid license as a 23respiratory care practitioner (i) hold oneself himself or 24herself out to the public as a respiratory care practitioner; 25(ii) use the title "respiratory care practitioner"; or (iii)   HB3681 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1perform or offer to perform the duties of a respiratory care 2practitioner, except as provided in Section 15 of this Act.3    (b) Nothing in the Act shall be construed to permit a 4person licensed as a respiratory care practitioner to engage 5in any manner in the practice of medicine in all its branches 6as defined by State law.7(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 8    (225 ILCS 106/22)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)10    Sec. 22. Durable medical equipment use and training.11    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, 12unlicensed or non-credentialed individuals who deliver 13prescribed respiratory care equipment, including, but not 14limited to, oxygen, oxygen concentrators, pulmonary hygiene 15devices, aerosol compressors and generators, suction machines, 16and positive airway pressure devices, may deliver, set up, 17calibrate, and demonstrate the mechanical operation of a 18specific piece of equipment to the patient, family, and 19caregivers, with the exception of mechanical ventilators, 20which only a licensed respiratory care practitioner or other 21authorized licensed personnel operating within the licensed 22respiratory care practitioner's or other authorized licensed 23personnel's the scope of his or her scope of practice may 24deliver and set up. Demonstration of the mechanical operation 25of a specific piece of equipment includes demonstration of the   HB3681 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1on-off switches, emergency buttons, and alarm silence and 2reset buttons, as appropriate. In order for unlicensed or 3non-credentialed personnel to deliver, set up, calibrate, and 4demonstrate a specific piece of equipment as allowed in this 5subsection (a), the employer must document that the employee 6has both received training and demonstrated competency using 7the specific piece of equipment under the supervision of a 8respiratory care practitioner licensed by this State or some 9other licensed practitioner operating within the licensed 10practitioner's his or her scope of practice.11    Equipment demonstration is not to be interpreted as 12teaching, administration, or performance of respiratory care. 13Unlicensed or non-credentialed individuals may not attach the 14equipment to the patient or instruct the patient, family, or 15caregiver on the use of the equipment beyond the mechanical 16functions of the device.17    (b) Patients, family, and caregivers must be taught to use 18the equipment for the intended clinical application by a 19licensed respiratory care practitioner or other licensed 20health care professional operating within the licensed 21practitioner's his or her scope of practice. This instruction 22may occur through follow-up after delivery, with an identical 23model in the health care facility prior to discharge or with an 24identical model at the medical supply office. Instructions to 25the patient regarding the clinical use of equipment, patient 26monitoring, patient assessment, or any other procedure used   HB3681 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1with the intent of evaluating the effectiveness of the 2treatment must be performed by a respiratory care practitioner 3licensed by this State or any other licensed practitioner 4operating within the licensed practitioner's his or her scope 5of practice. 6(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 7    (225 ILCS 106/30)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)9    Sec. 30. Powers and duties of the Department. Subject to 10the provision of this Act, the Department may:11        (a) Authorize examinations to ascertain the 12    qualifications and fitness of an applicant for licensure 13    as a respiratory care practitioner.14        (b) Pass upon the qualifications of an applicant for 15    licensure by endorsement.16        (c) Conduct hearings on proceedings to refuse to 17    issue, renew, or revoke a license or to suspend, place on 18    probation, or reprimand a license issued or applied for 19    under this Act.20        (d) Formulate rules required for the administration of 21    this Act. Notice of proposed rulemaking shall be 22    transmitted to the Board, and the Department shall review 23    the Board's response and any recommendations made in the 24    response. 25        (e) Solicit the advice and expert knowledge of the   HB3681 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1    Board on any matter relating to the administration and 2    enforcement of this Act.3        (f) (Blank).4        (g) (Blank). Maintain a roster of the names and 5    addresses of all licenses and all persons whose licenses 6    have been suspended, revoked, or denied renewal for cause 7    within the previous calendar year. The roster shall be 8    available upon written request and payment of the required 9    fee.10(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 11    (225 ILCS 106/35)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 35. Respiratory Care Board. 14    (a) The Secretary shall appoint a Respiratory Care Board 15which shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Secretary. 16The Board shall consist of 5 7 persons of which 3 4 members 17shall be currently engaged in the practice of respiratory care 18with a minimum of 3 years practice in the State of Illinois, 19one member shall be a qualified medical director, and one 20member 2 members shall be a hospital administrator 21administrators.22    (b) Members shall be appointed to a 4-year term. A member 23whose term has expired shall continue to serve until his or her 24successor is appointed and qualified. No member shall be 25reappointed to the Board for a term that would cause his or her   HB3681 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1continuous service on the Board to be longer than 10 years. 2Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made in the same 3manner as original appointments for the unexpired portion of 4the vacated term. 5    (c) The membership of the Board shall reasonably represent 6all the geographic areas in this State. The Secretary shall 7consider the recommendations of the organization representing 8the largest number of respiratory care practitioners for 9appointment of the respiratory care practitioner members of 10the Board and the organization representing the largest number 11of physicians licensed to practice medicine in all its 12branches for the appointment of the medical director to the 13Board.14    (d) The Secretary has the authority to remove any member 15of the Board for cause at any time before the expiration of his 16or her term. The Secretary shall be the sole arbiter of cause.17    (e) The Secretary shall consider the recommendations of 18the Board on questions involving standards of professional 19conduct, discipline, and qualifications of candidates for 20licensure under this Act.21    (f) The members of the Board shall be reimbursed for all 22legitimate and necessary expenses incurred in attending 23meetings of the Board.24    (g) A majority of the current members of Four members of 25the Board shall constitute a quorum. A vacancy in the 26membership of the Board shall not impair the right of a quorum   HB3681 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1to exercise all of the rights and perform all of the duties of 2the Board. 3    (h) Members of the Board shall be immune from suit in any 4action based upon any disciplinary proceedings or other 5activities performed as members of the Board, except for 6willful and wanton misconduct. 7(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 8    (225 ILCS 106/42)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)10    Sec. 42. Social Security Number or Individual Taxpayer 11Identification Number on license application. In addition to 12any other information required to be contained in the 13application, every application for an original license under 14this Act shall include the applicant's Social Security Number 15or Individual Taxpayer Identification Number, which shall be 16retained in the agency's records pertaining to the license. As 17soon as practical, the Department shall assign a customer's 18identification number to each applicant for a license.19    Every application for a renewal or restored license shall 20require the applicant's customer identification number. 21(Source: P.A. 97-400, eff. 1-1-12.) 22    (225 ILCS 106/50)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 50. Qualifications for a license.   HB3681 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1    (a) A person is qualified to be licensed as a licensed 2respiratory care practitioner, and the Department may issue a 3license authorizing the practice of respiratory care to an 4applicant who:5        (1) has applied in writing or electronically on the 6    prescribed form and has paid the required fee;7        (2) has successfully completed a respiratory care 8    training program approved by the Department;9        (3) has successfully passed an examination for the 10    practice of respiratory care authorized by the Department, 11    within 5 years of making application; and12        (4) has paid the fees required by this Act.13    Any person who has received certification by any state or 14national organization whose standards are accepted by the 15Department as being substantially similar to the standards in 16this Act may apply for a respiratory care practitioner license 17without examination.18    (b) Beginning 6 months after December 31, 2005, all 19individuals who provide satisfactory evidence to the 20Department of 3 years of experience, with a minimum of 400 21hours per year, in the practice of respiratory care during the 225 years immediately preceding December 31, 2005 shall be 23issued a license, unless the license may be denied under 24Section 95 of this Act. This experience must have been 25obtained while under the supervision of a certified 26respiratory therapist, a registered respiratory therapist, or   HB3681 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1a licensed registered nurse or under the supervision or 2direction of a licensed health care professional. All 3applications for a license under this subsection (b) shall be 4postmarked within 12 months after December 31, 2005.5    (c) A person may practice as a respiratory care 6practitioner if he or she has applied in writing to the 7Department in form and substance satisfactory to the 8Department for a license as a licensed respiratory care 9practitioner and has complied with all the provisions under 10this Section except for the passing of an examination to be 11eligible to receive such license, until the Department has 12made the decision that the applicant has failed to pass the 13next available examination authorized by the Department or has 14failed, without an approved excuse, to take the next available 15examination authorized by the Department or until the 16withdrawal of the application, but not to exceed 6 months. An 17applicant practicing professional registered respiratory care 18under this subsection (c) who passes the examination, however, 19may continue to practice under this subsection (c) until such 20time as he or she receives his or her license to practice or 21until the Department notifies him or her that the license has 22been denied. No applicant for licensure practicing under the 23provisions of this subsection (c) shall practice professional 24respiratory care except under the proximate direct supervision 25of a licensed health care professional or authorized licensed 26personnel. In no instance shall any such applicant practice or   HB3681 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1be employed in any supervisory capacity.2(Source: P.A. 94-523, eff. 1-1-06.) 3    (225 ILCS 106/60)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)5    Sec. 60. Professional identification; advertising. 6    (a) A person who is licensed pursuant to this Act with the 7Department of Professional Regulation in this State may use 8the title "respiratory care practitioner" and the abbreviation 9"RCP".10    (b) A licensee shall include in every advertisement for 11services regulated under this Act the licensee's his or her 12title as it appears on the license or the initials authorized 13under this Act.14(Source: P.A. 91-310, eff. 1-1-00; 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 15    (225 ILCS 106/65)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)17    Sec. 65. Licenses; renewal; restoration; inactive status. 18    (a) The expiration date and renewal period for each 19license issued under this Act shall be set by rule. The 20licensee may renew a license during the 30 day period 21preceding its expiration date by paying the required fee and 22demonstrating compliance with any continuing education 23requirements.24    (b) A person who has permitted a license to expire or who   HB3681 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1has a license on inactive status may have it restored by 2submitting an application to the Department and filing proof 3of fitness, as defined by rule, to have the license restored, 4including, if appropriate, evidence that is satisfactory to 5the Department certifying the active practice of respiratory 6care in another jurisdiction and by paying the required fee.7    A person practicing on an expired license is considered to 8be practicing without a license.9    (c) If the person has not maintained an active practice 10that is satisfactory to the Department in another 11jurisdiction, the Department shall determine the person's 12fitness to resume active status. The Department may require 13the person to complete a specified period of evaluated 14respiratory care and may require successful completion of an 15examination.16    (d) A person whose license expired while that person he or 17she was (1) in federal service on active duty with the Armed 18Forces of the United States or called into service or training 19with the State Militia, or (2) in training or education under 20the supervision of the United States government preliminary to 21induction into military service may have the his or her 22license restored without paying any lapsed renewal fees if, 23within 2 years after the termination of the person's his or her 24service, training, or education, except under conditions other 25than honorable, the Department is furnished with satisfactory 26evidence that the person has been so engaged and that the   HB3681 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1service, training, or education has been terminated.2    (e) A license to practice shall not be denied any 3applicant because of the applicant's race, religion, creed, 4national origin, political beliefs, or activities, age, sex, 5sexual orientation, or physical impairment.6(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 7    (225 ILCS 106/70)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)9    Sec. 70. Inactive status. A person who notifies the 10Department in writing on forms prescribed by the Department 11may elect to place the person's his or her license on an 12inactive status and shall, subject to rules of the Department, 13be excused from payment of renewal fees until that person he or 14she notifies the Department in writing of a desire to resume 15active status.16    A person requesting restoration from inactive status shall 17be required to pay the current renewal fee and shall be 18required to restore the his or her license as provided in 19Section 65 of this Act.20    Practice by a respiratory care practitioner whose license 21is in an inactive status shall be considered to be the 22unlicensed practice of respiratory care and shall be grounds 23for discipline under this Act.24(Source: P.A. 89-33, eff. 1-1-96.)   HB3681 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1    (225 ILCS 106/80)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 80. Returned checks; fines. Any person who delivers a 4check or other payment to the Department that is returned to 5the Department unpaid by the financial institution upon which 6it is drawn shall pay to the Department, in addition to the 7amount already owed to the Department, a fine of $50. The fines 8imposed by this Section are in addition to any other 9discipline provided under this Act for unlicensed practice or 10practice on a nonrenewed license. The Department shall notify 11the person that payment of fees and fines shall be paid to the 12Department by certified check or money order within 30 13calendar days of the notification. If, after the expiration of 1430 days from the date of the notification, the person has 15failed to submit the necessary remittance, the Department 16shall automatically terminate the license or certificate or 17deny the application, without hearing. If, after termination 18or denial, the person seeks a license or certificate, that 19person he or she shall apply to the Department for restoration 20or issuance of the license or certificate and pay all fees and 21fines due to the Department. The Department may establish a 22fee for the processing of an application for restoration of a 23license or certificate to pay all expenses of processing this 24application. The Secretary may waive the fines due under this 25Section in individual cases where the Secretary finds that the 26fines would be unreasonable or unnecessarily burdensome.  HB3681 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 2    (225 ILCS 106/85)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)4    Sec. 85. Endorsement. 5    (a) The Department may issue a license as a respiratory 6care practitioner without the required examination, to an 7applicant licensed under the laws of another state or United 8States jurisdiction whose standards in the opinion of the 9Department, are substantially equivalent at the date of the 10his or her licensure in the other jurisdiction to the 11requirements of this Act or the applicant, at the time of 12licensure, possessed individual qualifications which were 13substantially equivalent to the requirements of this Act. The 14applicant shall pay all of the required fees.15    (b) An applicant shall have 3 years from the date of 16application to complete the application process. If the 17process has not been completed within 3 years, the application 18shall be denied, the fee forfeited, and the applicant must 19reapply and meet the requirements in effect at the time of 20reapplication.21(Source: P.A. 89-33, eff. 1-1-96.) 22    (225 ILCS 106/90)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 90. Continuing education. Proof or certification of   HB3681 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1having met the minimum requirement of continuing education as 2determined by the Department shall be required of all license 3and certificate renewals. Pursuant to rule, the continuing 4education requirement may upon petition be waived in whole or 5in part if the respiratory care practitioner can demonstrate 6that the practitioner he or she had served in the Coast Guard 7or Armed Forces, had an extreme hardship as defined by rule, or 8obtained the license or certification by examination or 9endorsement within the preceding renewal period.10    The Department shall establish by rule a means for the 11verification of completion of the continuing education 12required by this Section. This verification may be 13accomplished through audits of records maintained by 14licensees; by requiring the filing of continuing education 15certificates with the Department; or by other means 16established by the Department.17(Source: P.A. 89-33, eff. 1-1-96.) 18    (225 ILCS 106/95)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)20    Sec. 95. Grounds for discipline. 21    (a) The Department may refuse to issue, renew, or may 22revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand, or take other 23disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the Department 24considers appropriate, including the issuance of fines not to 25exceed $10,000 for each violation, with regard to any license   HB3681 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1for any one or combination of the following:2        (1) Material misstatement in furnishing information to 3    the Department or to any other State or federal agency.4        (2) Violations of this Act, or any of the rules 5    adopted under this Act.6        (3) Conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 7    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or by 8    sentencing of any crime, including, but not limited to, 9    convictions preceding sentences of supervision, 10    conditional discharge, or first offender probation, under 11    the laws of any jurisdiction of the United States or any 12    state or territory thereof: (i) that is a felony or (ii) 13    that is a misdemeanor, an essential element of which is 14    dishonesty, or that is directly related to the practice of 15    the profession.16        (4) Making any misrepresentation for the purpose of 17    obtaining a license.18        (5) Professional incompetence or negligence in the 19    rendering of respiratory care services.20        (6) Malpractice.21        (7) Aiding or assisting another person in violating 22    any rules or provisions of this Act.23        (8) Failing to provide information within 60 days in 24    response to a written request made by the Department.25        (9) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 26    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive,   HB3681 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1    defraud, or harm the public.2        (10) Violating the rules of professional conduct 3    adopted by the Department.4        (11) Discipline by another jurisdiction, if at least 5    one of the grounds for the discipline is the same or 6    substantially equivalent to those set forth in this Act.7        (12) Directly or indirectly giving to or receiving 8    from any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or 9    association any fee, commission, rebate, or other form of 10    compensation for any professional services not actually 11    rendered. Nothing in this paragraph (12) affects any bona 12    fide independent contractor or employment arrangements 13    among health care professionals, health facilities, health 14    care providers, or other entities, except as otherwise 15    prohibited by law. Any employment arrangements may include 16    provisions for compensation, health insurance, pension, or 17    other employment benefits for the provision of services 18    within the scope of the licensee's practice under this 19    Act. Nothing in this paragraph (12) shall be construed to 20    require an employment arrangement to receive professional 21    fees for services rendered. 22        (13) A finding that the licensee, after having the her 23    or his license placed on probationary status or subject to 24    conditions or restrictions, has violated the terms of 25    probation or failed to comply with such terms or 26    conditions.  HB3681 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1        (14) Abandonment of a patient.2        (15) Willfully filing false records or reports 3    relating to a licensee's practice including, but not 4    limited to, false records filed with a federal or State 5    agency or department.6        (16) Willfully failing to report an instance of 7    suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the Abused 8    and Neglected Child Reporting Act.9        (17) Providing respiratory care, other than pursuant 10    to an order.11        (18) Physical or mental disability including, but not 12    limited to, deterioration through the aging process or 13    loss of motor skills that results in the inability to 14    practice the profession with reasonable judgment, skill, 15    or safety.16        (19) Solicitation of professional services by using 17    false or misleading advertising.18        (20) Failure to file a tax return, or to pay the tax, 19    penalty, or interest shown in a filed return, or to pay any 20    final assessment of tax penalty, or interest, as required 21    by any tax Act administered by the Illinois Department of 22    Revenue or any successor agency or the Internal Revenue 23    Service or any successor agency.24        (21) Irregularities in billing a third party for 25    services rendered or in reporting charges for services not 26    rendered.  HB3681 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1        (22) Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 2    report by the Department of Children and Family Services 3    under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, and 4    upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the 5    licensee has caused a child to be an abused child or 6    neglected child as defined in the Abused and Neglected 7    Child Reporting Act.8        (23) Habitual or excessive use or addiction to 9    alcohol, narcotics, stimulants, or any other chemical 10    agent or drug that results in an inability to practice 11    with reasonable skill, judgment, or safety.12        (24) Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 13    report by the Department on Aging under the Adult 14    Protective Services Act, and upon proof by clear and 15    convincing evidence that the licensee has caused an adult 16    with disabilities or an older adult to be abused or 17    neglected as defined in the Adult Protective Services Act.18        (25) Willfully failing to report an instance of 19    suspected abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or 20    self-neglect of an adult with disabilities or an older 21    adult as required by the Adult Protective Services Act.22        (26) Willful omission to file or record, or willfully 23    impeding the filing or recording, or inducing another 24    person to omit to file or record medical reports as 25    required by law or willfully failing to report an instance 26    of suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the   HB3681 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1    Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act.2        (27) Practicing under a false or assumed name, except 3    as provided by law.4        (28) Willfully or negligently violating the 5    confidentiality between licensee and patient, except as 6    required by law.7        (29) The use of any false, fraudulent, or deceptive 8    statement in any document connected with the licensee's 9    practice. 10    (b) The determination by a court that a licensee is 11subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission as 12provided in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 13Code will result in an automatic suspension of the licensee's 14his or her license. The suspension will end upon a finding by a 15court that the licensee is no longer subject to involuntary 16admission or judicial admission, the issuance of an order so 17finding and discharging the patient, and the recommendation of 18the Board to the Secretary that the licensee be allowed to 19resume the licensee's his or her practice.20    All fines imposed under this Section shall be paid within 2160 days after the effective date of the order imposing the fine 22or in accordance with the terms set forth in the order imposing 23the fine. 24(Source: P.A. 98-49, eff. 7-1-13; 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 25    (225 ILCS 106/100)  HB3681 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)2    Sec. 100. Violations; injunctions; cease and desist order. 3    (a) If a person violates any provision of this Act, the 4Secretary may, in the name of the People of the State of 5Illinois, through the Attorney General, petition for an order 6enjoining the violation or an order enforcing compliance with 7this Act. Upon the filling of a verified petition, the court 8with appropriate jurisdiction may issue a temporary 9restraining order without notice or bond and may preliminarily 10and permanently enjoin the violation. If it is established 11that the person has violated or is violating the injunction, 12the court may punish the offender for contempt of court. 13Proceedings under this Section are in addition to all other 14remedies and penalties provided by this Act.15    (b) If a person holds oneself himself or herself out as 16being a respiratory care practitioner under this Act and is 17not licensed to do so, then any licensed respiratory care 18practitioner, interested party, or injured person may petition 19for relief as provided in subsection (a) of this Section.20    (c) Whenever, in the opinion of the Department, a person 21violates any provision of this Act, the Department may issue a 22rule to show cause why an order to cease and desist should not 23be entered against that person. The rule shall clearly set 24forth the grounds relied upon by the Department and shall 25allow at least 7 days from the date of the rule to file an 26answer satisfactory to the Department. Failure to answer to   HB3681 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1the satisfaction of the Department shall cause an order to 2cease and desist to be issued.3(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 4    (225 ILCS 106/105)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)6    Sec. 105. Investigations; notice; hearing. The Department 7may investigate the actions of an applicant, a licensee, or a 8person claiming to hold a license. The Department shall, 9before revoking, suspending, placing on probation, 10reprimanding, or taking any other disciplinary action under 11Section 95 of this Act, at least 30 days before the date set 12for the hearing (i) notify the accused, in writing, of any 13charges made and the time and place for the hearing on the 14charges, (ii) direct the accused him or her to file a written 15answer to the charges with the Board under oath within 20 days 16after the service upon the accused him or her of the notice, 17and (iii) inform the accused that, if the accused fails he or 18she fails to answer, default will be taken against the accused 19him or her and the accused's his or her license may be 20suspended, revoked, placed on probationary status, or other 21disciplinary action taken with regard to the license, 22including limiting the scope, nature, or extent of the 23accused's his or her practice, without a hearing, as the 24Department may consider proper. In case the person, after 25receiving notice, fails to file an answer, the person's his or   HB3681 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1her license may, in the discretion of the Department, be 2suspended, revoked, placed on probationary status, or the 3Department may take whatever disciplinary action is considered 4proper, including, limiting the scope, nature, or extent of 5the person's practice or the imposition of a fine, without a 6hearing, if the act or acts charged constitute sufficient 7grounds for an action under this Act. The written notice may be 8served by personal delivery or certified mail to the address 9of record or by email to the email address of record.10(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 11    (225 ILCS 106/110)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 110. Record of proceedings; transcript. The 14Department, at its expense, shall provide a certified 15shorthand reporter to take down the testimony and preserve the 16record of all proceedings at a formal hearing of any case. The 17notice of hearing, complaint, all other documents in the 18nature of pleadings and written motions filed in the 19proceedings, the transcript of testimony, the report of the 20Board and orders of the Department shall be in the record of 21the proceedings. The record may be made available to any 22person interested in the hearing upon payment of the fee 23required by Section 2105-115 of the Department of Professional 24Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 25(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.)   HB3681 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1    (225 ILCS 106/135)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 135. Secretary; rehearing. Whenever the Secretary 4believes that substantial justice has not been done in the 5revocation, suspension, refusal to issue or renew a license, 6or any other discipline of an applicant or licensee, the 7Secretary he or she may order a rehearing by the same or other 8hearing officers.9(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 10    (225 ILCS 106/155)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)12    Sec. 155. Surrender of license. Upon the revocation or 13suspension of a license, the licensee shall immediately 14surrender the his or her license to the Department. If the 15licensee fails to do so, the Department has the right to seize 16the license.17(Source: P.A. 89-33, eff. 1-1-96.) 18    (225 ILCS 106/160)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)20    Sec. 160. Summary suspension of license. The Secretary may 21summarily suspend the license of a respiratory care 22practitioner without a hearing, simultaneously with the 23institution of proceedings for a hearing provided for in   HB3681 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1Section 105 of this Act, if the Secretary finds that evidence 2in the Secretary's his or her possession indicates that the 3continuation of practice by the respiratory care practitioner 4would constitute an imminent danger to the public. In the 5event that the Secretary summarily suspends the license of 6respiratory care practitioner without a hearing, a hearing 7must be commenced within 30 calendar days after the suspension 8has occurred and concluded as expeditiously as practical.9(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 10    (225 ILCS 106/170)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)12    Sec. 170. Administrative review; certification of record; 13costs. 14    All final administrative decisions of the Department are 15subject to judicial review pursuant to the Administrative 16Review Law and its rules. The term "administrative decision" 17is defined as in Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure.18    Proceedings for judicial review shall be commenced in the 19circuit court of the county in which the party applying for 20review resides, but if the party is not a resident of this 21State, the venue shall be in Sangamon County. 22    The Department shall not be required to certify any record 23to the court, or file an answer in court, or otherwise appear 24in any court in a judicial review proceeding, unless and until 25the Department has received from the plaintiff payment of the   HB3681 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1costs of furnishing and certifying the record, which costs 2shall be determined by the Department. Exhibits shall be 3certified without cost. Failure on the part of the plaintiff 4to file a receipt is grounds for dismissal of the action. 5During the pendency and hearing of any and all judicial 6proceedings incident to the disciplinary action, the sanctions 7imposed upon the accused by the Department specified in the 8Department's final administrative decision shall, as a matter 9of public policy, remain in full force and effect in order to 10protect the public pending final resolution of any of the 11proceedings. 12(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 13    (225 ILCS 106/180)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)15    Sec. 180. Illinois Administrative Procedure Act; 16application. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 17hereby expressly adopted and incorporated in this Act as if 18all of the provisions of the Act were included in this Act, 19except that the provision of paragraph (d) of Section 10-65 of 20the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, which provides that 21at hearings the registrant or licensee has the right to show 22compliance with all lawful requirements for retention or 23continuation or renewal of the license, is specifically 24excluded. For the purpose of this Act, the notice required 25under Section 10-25 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure   HB3681 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 09452 AAS 19512 b1Act is considered sufficient when mailed to address of record 2or emailed to the email address of record of the licensee or 3applicant.4(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Section and Section 5 6take effect upon becoming law.